Hawaii statutes.
[PART I.
LEAD ACID BATTERIES]

Note

Part heading added by revisor.

In this part, “part” substituted for “chapter”.

§342I-1 Lead acid batteries; disposal
prohibited. (a) No person may:

(1) Place a used lead acid battery in mixed municipal
solid waste; or

(2) Discard or otherwise dispose of a lead acid
battery, except by delivery to:

(A) A lead acid battery retailer or
wholesaler;

(B) A collection or recycling facility
permitted under chapter 342H; or

(C) A secondary lead smelter permitted by the
United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(b) No lead acid battery retailer or
wholesaler, or authorized collection or recycling facility, shall accept for
disposal any lead acid batteries that have had their electrolyte removed,
unless cracks in the battery shell due to aging or accident are in evidence to
indicate passive leaking of the electrolyte. [L 1989, c 281, pt of §1; am L
1991, c 201, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next